Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1406.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 following:* * *(14.2) Article XVIII-I.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-IKEYSTONE LITERACY INVESTMENT TAX CREDITSection 1801-I. Scope of article.This article relates to the Keystone Literacy Investment Tax Credit.Section 1802-I. Legislative intent.It is the intent of this article to fund the evidence-based reading instruction program under Article XV-N of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949. Proficiency in reading is foundational to academic achievement across all disciplines and essential to long-term success in life and the workforce. By investing in evidence-based structured literacy instruction, the Commonwealth ensures that every student acquires the literacy skills necessary to thrive, while also strengthening workforce productivity, expanding economic opportunity and reducing long-term social costs.Section 1803-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Allocation amount." The total amount of tax credits purchased by a qualified taxpayer."Capital." The amount of money that a purchaser contributes to the program.20260SB1406PN1870 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Keystone Literacy Investment Fund."Insurance premiums tax liability." Any liability incurred by an insurance company under Article IX."Program." The Keystone Literacy Investment Program."Qualified taxpayer." Any of the following that has insurance premiums tax liability and contributes capital to purchase premiums tax credits under this article:(1) An insurance company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth.(2) A holding company that has at least one insurance company subsidiary authorized to do business in this Commonwealth."Tax credit." A credit against insurance premiums tax liability offered to or held by a qualified taxpayer under this article.Section 1804-I. Tax credit.A qualified taxpayer may purchase tax credits from the department in accordance with this article and may apply the tax credits against the qualified taxpayer's insurance premiums tax liability in accordance with this article.Section 1805-I. Duties.(a) Sale of tax credits.--The department may sell up to $150,000,000 in tax credits to qualified taxpayers. The sale of the tax credits shall be in accordance with section 1808-I.(b) Time of sale.--The sale authorized under subsection (a) shall occur by January 31, 2027.Section 1806-I. Use of tax credits by qualified taxpayers.(a) Use against insurance premiums tax liability.--A 20260SB1406PN1870 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 qualified taxpayer that purchases tax credits under section 1805-I may claim the credits beginning in calendar year 2029 against insurance premiums tax liability incurred for a taxable year that begins on or after January 1, 2028.(b) Application to department.--A qualified taxpayer seeking to use purchased tax credits may submit an application to the department in a manner prescribed by the department.(c) Construction.--(1) A qualified taxpayer may not be required to reduce the amount of insurance premiums tax included by the taxpayer in connection with ratemaking for any insurance contract written in this Commonwealth because of a reduction of the taxpayer's insurance premiums tax liability derived from the tax credit purchased under this article.(2) If, under the insurance laws of this Commonwealth, the assets of the qualified taxpayer are examined or considered, the taxpayer's balance of tax credits shall be treated as an admitted asset subject to the same financial rating as held by the Commonwealth.(d) Limitations.--(1) The total amount of tax credits applied against insurance premiums tax liability by all qualified taxpayers in a fiscal year may not exceed $50,000,000 per year beginning in calendar year 2029.(2) The credit to be applied in any one year may not exceed the insurance premiums tax liability of the qualified taxpayer for that taxable year.Section 1807-I. Sale, carryover and carryback.(a) Carryover.--If the qualified taxpayer cannot use the entire amount of the tax credit for the taxable year in which 20260SB1406PN1870 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the taxpayer is eligible for the credit, the excess may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the qualified tax liability of the taxpayer for those taxable years, provided that the credit may not be carried over to any taxable year that begins after December 31, 2034.(b) Sale.--No sooner than 30 days after providing the Insurance Department and the department written notice of the intent to transfer tax credits, a qualified taxpayer may transfer tax credits held without restriction to any entity that is a qualified taxpayer in good standing with the Insurance Department and agrees to assume all of the transferor's obligations with respect to the tax credit.(c) Carryback.--A qualified taxpayer may not carry back a tax credit.Section 1808-I. Sale of tax credits to qualified taxpayers.(a) Conduct of sale.--The sale of tax credits authorized under section 1805-I(a) shall be conducted in accordance with this section.(b) Process.--The department may sell the tax credits authorized under this article or may contract with an independent third party to conduct a bidding process among qualified taxpayers to purchase the credits. In raising capital for the program, the department shall have the discretion to distribute credits using a market-driven approach or any approach that maximizes the yield to the Commonwealth.(c) Application.--A qualified taxpayer seeking to purchase tax credits may apply to the department in the manner prescribed by the department.(d) Bidding process.--Using procedures adopted by the department or, if applicable, by an independent third party, 20260SB1406PN1870 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each qualified taxpayer that submits an application shall make a timely and irrevocable offer, subject only to the department's issuance to the taxpayer of tax credit certificates, to make specified contributions of capital to the department on dates specified by the department.(e) Contents of offer.--The offer under subsection (d) must include all of the following:(1) The requested amount of tax credits, which may not be less than $500,000.(2) The qualified taxpayer's capital contribution for each tax credit dollar requested, which may not be less than the greater of:(i) 75% of the requested dollar amount of tax credits; or(ii) the percentage of the requested dollar amount of tax credits that the department and, if applicable, the independent third party determines to be consistent with market conditions as of the offer date.(3) Any other information the department or, if applicable, independent third party requires.(f) Notice of approval.--A qualified taxpayer that submits an application under this section shall receive a written notice from the department indicating whether or not the qualified taxpayer has been approved as a purchaser of tax credits and, if so, the amount of tax credits allocated.(g) Limitation.--No tax credits may be sold if the bidding process, upon completion, has failed to yield at least $20,000,000 in revenue.Section 1809-I. Payment for tax credits purchased and certificates.20260SB1406PN1870 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Payment of capital.--(1) Capital committed by a qualified taxpayer shall be paid to the department for deposit into the fund.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the department from establishing an installment payment schedule for capital payments to be made by the qualified taxpayer.(b) Issuance of tax credit certificates.--On receipt of payment of capital, the department shall issue to each qualified taxpayer a tax credit certificate representing a fully vested credit against insurance premiums tax liability.(c) Certificate issued in accordance with bidding process.--The department shall issue tax credit certificates to qualified taxpayers in accordance with the bidding process selected by the department or the independent third party.(d) Contents.--The tax credit certificate shall state:(1) The total amount of premiums tax credits that the qualified taxpayer may claim.(2) The amount of capital that the qualified taxpayer has contributed or agreed to contribute in return for the issuance of the tax credit certificate.(3) The dates on which the tax credits will be available for use by the qualified taxpayer.(4) Any penalties or other remedies for noncompliance.(5) The procedures to be used for transferring the tax credits.(6) Any other requirements the department considers necessary.Section 1810-I. Failure to make contribution of capital and reallocation.20260SB1406PN1870 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Prohibition.--A tax credit certificate under section 1809-I may not be issued to a qualified taxpayer that fails to make a contribution of capital within the time the department specifies.(b) Penalty.--A qualified taxpayer that fails to make a contribution of capital within the time the department specifies shall be subject to a penalty equal to 10% of the amount of capital that remains unpaid. The penalty shall be paid to the department not later than 30 days after demand.(c) Reallocation.--The department may offer to reallocate the defaulted capital among other qualified taxpayers so that the result after reallocation is the same as if the initial allocation had been performed without considering the tax credit allocation to the defaulting qualified taxpayer.(d) Contribution.--If the reallocation of capital under subsection (c) results in the contribution by another qualified taxpayer of the amount of capital not contributed by the defaulting qualified taxpayer, the department may waive the penalty provided under subsection (b).(e) Transfer.--(1) A qualified taxpayer that fails to make a contribution of capital within the time specified may avoid the imposition of the penalty by transferring the allocation of tax credits to a new or existing qualified taxpayer not later than 30 days after the due date of the defaulted installment.(2) A transferee of an allocation of tax credits of a defaulting qualified taxpayer under this subsection shall make the required contribution of capital not later than 30 days after the date of the transfer.20260SB1406PN1870 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1811-I. The Keystone Literacy Investment Program.(a) Establishment.--The Keystone Literacy Investment Program is established within the department.(b) Fund.--The Keystone Literacy Investment Fund is established in the State Treasury.(c) Distribution.--The department shall deposit the net proceeds received by the department as a result of the sale of tax credits under section 1805-I(a) into the fund.(d) Deposit of money.--No administrative action shall prevent the deposit of money into the fund in the fiscal year in which the money is received.(e) Continuing appropriation.--The money in the fund is appropriated to the Department of Education on a continuing basis to award grants to school entities under Article XV-N of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.Section 1812-I. Guidelines.The department, in consultation with the Department of Education, shall publish guidelines implementing this article.Section 1813-I. Report.(a) Duties.--On or before January 31, 2029, and January 31 of each subsequent year through 2035, the department, in consultation with the Department of Education, shall:(1) Submit a report on the implementation of the program to all of the following:(i) The Governor.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of 20260SB1406PN1870 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Representatives.(2) Publish the report under paragraph (1) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Contents.--The report under subsection (a) shall include the following:(1) The name of the purchaser of premiums tax credits.(2) The amount of premiums tax credits allocated to the purchaser.(3) The amount of capital the purchaser contributed for the issuance of the tax credit certificate.(4) The amount of any tax credits that have been transferred under section 1810-I(e).(5) The amount of funds received by the recipients during the previous year.(6) The cumulative amount of capital received by the department in connection with the sale of the tax credits.(7) The names and locations of school entities receiving grants under section 1507-N of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1406PN1870 - 10 - 1234567891011121314151617181920